District of Columbia statutes.
29-313.03

Scope of inspection right.

(a)

A shareholder’s agent or attorney shall have the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder represented.

(b)

The right to copy records under § 29-313.02 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies by xerographic or other means, including copies through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the shareholder.

(c)

The corporation may comply at its expense with a shareholder’s demand to inspect the record of shareholders under § 29-313.02(b)(3) by providing the shareholder with a list of shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder’s demand.

(d)

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge shall not exceed the estimated cost of production, reproduction, or transmission of the records.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History